Vermont, session 2025-2026, H221.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FIREARM SURRENDER ORDER COMPLIANCE WORKING
GROUP; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Firearm Surrender Order Compliance
Working Group to develop a uniform process to ensure compliance with court
orders to surrender firearms. The Working Group shall study what statutory or
policy changes are needed to create a uniform process to monitor compliance,
support entities charged with storing surrendered firearms, and identify a stable
VT LEG #380492 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.221
2025 Page 2 of 5
and reliable funding source for any additional resources needed to monitor
compliance.
(b) Membership. The Working Group shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;
(2) a member of the Vermont State Police, appointed by the
Commissioner of Public Safety;
(3) the Commissioner of Corrections or designee;
(4) the Chief Superior Court Judge or designee;
(5) two family law practitioners, appointed by the Vermont Bar
Association;
(6) the Defender General or designee;
(7) one State’s Attorney or designee, appointed by the Department of
State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs;
(8) the Attorney General or designee;
(9) a member, appointed by the Vermont Network Against Domestic
and Sexual Violence;
(10) a member, appointed by the Vermont Council on Domestic
Violence;
(11) a member, appointed by the Vermont Center for Crime Victim
Services;
VT LEG #380492 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.221
2025 Page 3 of 5
(12) a Victim Advocate, appointed by the Department of State’s
Attorneys and Sheriffs;
(13) an advocate from a culturally specific advocacy organization that
works with domestic violence victims, appointed by the Network Against
Domestic and Sexual Violence;
(14) a member who is a federal firearms licensee, appointed by the State
Police representative overseeing the current firearms storage program for the
Department of Public Safety;
(15) a member, appointed by the Vermont Office of the Bureau of
Alcohol Tobacco and Firearms;
(16) a physician, appointed by the Vermont Medical Society;
(17) the Commissioner of Mental Health or designee;
(18) a sheriff, appointed by the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs; and
(19) a police chief, appointed by the Vermont Association of Chiefs of
Police.
(c) Powers and duties. The Working Group shall:
(1) Define a workable statewide compliance model that ensures
accountability of respondents and defendants while addressing safety needs of
the plaintiffs and victims.
VT LEG #380492 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.221
2025 Page 4 of 5
(2) Determine how such a compliance model would work in both the
Family and Criminal Divisions of the Superior Courts.
(3) Determine what legislative changes are needed to support the model.
(4) Assess the necessary capacity and resources of the Judiciary, law
enforcement, and the Department of Corrections to create a model for
statewide accountability and compliance with firearm surrender orders.
(5) Consult with the Domestic Violence Firearms Technical Assistance
Project to determine what additional actions should be taken under existing law
to promote and ensure compliance with firearm surrender orders.
(6) Engage with federal firearms licensees to understand their role in
storing surrendered firearms.
(d) Assistance. The Working Group shall have the administrative,
technical, and legal assistance of the Office of the Attorney General.
(e) Report. On or before November 15, 2025, the Working Group shall
report its recommendations to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary
and to the Joint Legislative Justice Oversight Committee. The report may take
the form of proposed legislation.
(f) Meetings.
(1) The Attorney General or designee shall call the first meeting of the
Working Group to occur on or before June 1, 2025.
(2) The Working Group shall meet not more than six times per year.
VT LEG #380492 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.221
2025 Page 5 of 5
(3) The Attorney General or designee shall serve as the Chair of the
Working Group.
(4) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(5) The Working Group shall cease to exist on January 15, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Working Group
who are not employees of the State of Vermont and who are not otherwise
compensated or reimbursed for their attendance shall be entitled to
compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 1010
for not more than six meetings per year.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380492 v.1